sv: Monteringstyp för bouncer: Bogar; Elinchrom; Profoto; Blixt; Universell; Övrigt
en: Softbox mounting type: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Speedlight; Universal; Other
ko: 소프트박스 장착 유형: 보웬; 엘린크롬; 프로포토; 스피드라이트; 범용; 기타
ro-RO: Tip de montare softbox: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Speedlight; Universal; Altele
zh-TW: 柔光箱安裝類型: 鮑恩斯式; 愛玲瓏; 保富圖; 閃光燈; 通用; 其他
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งซอฟต์บ็อกซ์: ตัวยึดไฟสตูดิโอ; Elinchrom; Profoto; แฟลชเสริมภายนอก; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ montáže softboxu: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Blesk; Univerzálny; Iné
vi: Loại giá đỡ hộp làm mềm ánh sáng: Bowens; Đèn Elinchrom; Đèn Profoto; Đèn speedlight; Phổ biến; Khác
hu: Softbox rögzítési típusa: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Vaku; Univerzális; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem de softbox: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Velocidade da luz; Universal; Outro
hr-HR: Način postavljanja softboxa: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Bljeskalica; Univerzalno; Ostalo
tr: Softbox montaj türü: Bowens; Elinkrom; Profil fotoğrafı; Işık hızı; Her türden mekana uygun; Diğer
nb: Softbox-monteringstype: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Speedlight; Universal; Annet
it: Tipo di montaggio del softbox: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Speedlight; Universale; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže softboxa: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Speedlight; Univerzalno; Drugo
nl: Type softboxmontage: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Snelheidslampje; Universeel; Andere
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на софтбокс: Боуенс; Elinchrom; Profoto; Светкавица; Универсален; Други
cs: Typ montáže softboxu: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Světlomet; Univerzální; Jiné
fi: Tasovalon kiinnitystapa: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Speedlight; Yleinen; Muu
de: Befestigungsart der Softbox: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Speedlight; Universell; Sonstiges
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης softbox: Μπόουενς; Elinchrom; Profoto; Speedlight; Universal; Άλλο
ja: ソフトボックスの取り付けタイプ: ボーエンズ; エリンクローム; プロフォト; スピードライト; ユニバーサル; その他
zh-CN: 柔光箱安装方式: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; 闪光管; 通用; 其他
lt-LT: Šviesadėžės tvirtinimo tipas: „Bowens“; „Elinchrom“; „Profoto“; „Speedlight“; Universalus; Kita
da: Softbox-monteringstype: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Trafiklys; Universal; Andet
pl: Typ mocowania softboksa: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Lampa błyskowa; Uniwersalny; Inne
fr: Type de montage de la boîte à lumière: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Vitesse de la lumière; Universel; Autre
ru: Тип крепления софтбокса: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Speedlight; Универсальный; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação de softbox: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Speedlight; Universal; Outro
es: Tipo de montaje de softbox: Bowens; Elinchrom; Profoto; Velocidad de la luz; Universal; Otros